Georgia, session 2025_26, SB316.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
(a) The governing authority of Clinch County is authorized to adopt a resolution authorizing
the clerk of the Probate Court of Clinch County shall be authorized to charge and collect a
technology fee in an amount not to exceed $5.00, as set from time to time by the governing
authority by resolution, for the filing of on every civil action filed, every estate filed, as well
as a surcharge on each fine assessed by the probate court, each conviction, and each filing
of an affidavit, except for affidavits of indigency. The Probate Court Technology Fee shall
be assessed and collected not more than once per party within any one action or proceeding.
Such technology fees shall be used exclusively to provide for technological needs of the
Probate Court of Clinch County. Such uses shall include only the following:
(1) Computer hardware, software, and accessory purchases;
S. B. 316
- 1 -

LC 44 2994
(2) Lease, maintenance, and installation of computer hardware;
(3) Purchase, lease, maintenance, and installation of imaging, scanning, facsimile,
communications, projection, and printing equipment and software; and
(4) Procurement of services or equipment for the conversion of court records and
archives to digital content for public access.
(b) Funds collected pursuant to this section shall be collected by the clerk of the probate
court and remitted to the governing authority of the county on a monthly basis. Such
proceeds shall be maintained by the governing authority of the county in a separate,
segregated account, provided however as long as the Probate Judge and Magistrate Judge are
consolidated, the Probate Court Technology Fee and Magistrate Court Technology Fee and
may be maintained in a joint consolidated account, and shall be expended solely for the
purposes enumerated in subsection (a) of this Act. Such account shall be audited by such
governing authority annually.
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 316
- 2 -